Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3604.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 239.791, subdivision 17, is amended to read: Subd. 17. Bulk delivery of premium grade gasoline; exemption. (a) A person responsible for the product may offer for sale, sell, or deliver a bulk delivery of unleaded premium grade gasoline, as defined in section 239.751, subdivision 4, that is not oxygenated in accordance with subdivision 1 if the conditions in paragraphs (b) to deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (e)new text end are met. (b) Nonoxygenated gas is only for use in vehicles that qualify for an exemption under subdivision 12, paragraph (a). (c) No more than one bulk fuel storage tank on the premises may be used for storage of the nonoxygenated gasoline. (d) The bulk fuel delivery is 500 gallons or less. new text begin (e) The bulk fuel delivery is made directly into (1) the attached fuel tank of a vehicle that is listed as exempt under subdivision 12, or (2) a bulk tank on the premises. new text end